Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this  2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 274.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Abandoned vessel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.908.
(b) “Derelict vessel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.908.
(2) The Oregon Abandoned and Derelict Vessel Program is established in the  Department
of State Lands to:
(a) Address abandoned vessels and derelict vessels; and
(b) Ensure  that state-owned submerged and submersible lands are managed for the public
interests in fishery, navigation, commerce and recreation.
(3) The Department of State Lands, under the direction of the State Land Board and in
coordination with the State Marine  Board, the Department of Environmental Quality, the
State Parks and Recreation Department  and other stakeholders identified by the Department
of State  Lands, shall develop the policy framework for the program established in subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) The Department of State  Lands may adopt rules necessary to implement the pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Abandoned and Derelict Vessel Fund  is established in the
State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Abandoned and Derelict Vessel Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are
continuously appropriated to the Department of State Lands for the  purpose of carrying out
the provisions of the Oregon Abandoned and Derelict Vessel Program.
(2) The department  may accept grants, donations, contributions or gifts from any source
for deposit in the fund.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys received by the department as provided by subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund;
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
SECTION 4.
The Department of State  Lands shall submit a report on the department’s
progress in implementing section 2 of this 2023 Act, and may include  recommendations for
Enrolled House Bill 2914 (HB 2914-A) Page 1
legislation, to the committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to the environment, land
use and natural resources  in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before February
15, 2024.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 8, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2914 (HB 2914-A) Page 2